Missouri, session 2026, HB2707.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 116.332, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 116.332, to read as follows:
116.332. 1. Before a constitutional amendment petition, a statutory initiative petition,
or a referendum petition may be circulated for signatures, a sample sheet must be submitted to
the secretary of state in the form in which it will be circulated. When a person submits a
sample sheet of a petition he or she shall designate to the secretary of state the name and
address of the person to whom any notices shall be sent pursuant to sections 116.140 and
116.180 and, if a committee or person, except the individual submitting the sample sheet, is
funding any portion of the drafting or submitting of the sample sheet, the person submitting
the sample sheet shall submit a copy of the filed statement of committee organization required
under subsection 5 of section 130.021 showing the date the statement was filed. The
secretary of state shall refer a copy of the petition sheet to the attorney general for his
approval and to the state auditor for purposes of preparing a fiscal note and fiscal note
summary. The secretary of state and attorney general must each review the petition for
sufficiency as to form and approve or reject the form of the petition, stating the reasons for
rejection, if any.
2. Within two business days of receipt of any such sample sheet, the office of the
secretary of state shall conspicuously post on its website the text of the proposed measure, a
disclaimer stating that such text may not constitute the full and correct text as required under
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2707 2
section 116.050, and the name of the person or organization submitting the sample sheet. The
secretary of state's failure to comply with such posting shall be considered a violation of
chapter 610 and subject to the penalties provided under subsection 3 of section 610.027. The
posting shall be removed within three days of either the withdrawal of the petition under
section 116.115 or the rejection for any reason of the petition.
3. Upon receipt of a petition from the office of the secretary of state, the attorney
general shall examine the petition as to form and for compliance with the Constitution of
Missouri and applicable statutes.
(1) If the petition is rejected as to form, the attorney general shall forward his or her
comments to the secretary of state within ten days after receipt of the petition by the attorney
general. If the petition is approved as to form, the attorney general shall forward his or her
approval as to form to the secretary of state within ten days after receipt of the petition by the
attorney general.
(2) If the petition is not compliant with the Constitution of Missouri and
applicable statutes, the attorney general shall return the petition to the secretary of state
within ten days after receipt of the petition by the attorney general and include a written
description of the conflicts. If the petition is compliant with the Constitution of Missouri
and applicable statutes, the attorney general shall forward his or her approval within
ten days after receipt of the petition by the attorney general.
4. The secretary of state shall review the comments and statements of the attorney
general as to form and make a final decision as to the approval or rejection of the form of the
petition. The secretary of state shall send written notice to the person who submitted the
petition sheet of the approval within fifteen days after submission of the petition sheet. The
secretary of state shall send written notice if the petition has been rejected, together with
reasons for rejection, within fifteen days after submission of the petition sheet.
✔